Mississippi, session 2026, SB2573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares that: (a)  In 1864, the United States Congress established the National Statuary Hall Collection in the Old Hall of the House of Representatives in the United States Capitol and authorized each state to contribute to the hall collection two (2) statues that represent important historic figures of each state; (b)  Mississippi currently has on display in the National Statuary Hall Collection statues of Jefferson Davis and James Zachariah George given by the State of Mississippi in 1931; (c)  In 2000, the United States Congress enacted legislation authorizing states to request that the Joint Committee on the Library of Congress approve the replacement of statues that states had provided for display in the hall collection; (d)  The State of Mississippi has a rich heritage in art, literature, music, and history; and (e)  In the spirit of unity and for the sake of displaying to our nation historic figures who bring honor to all Mississippians, taking into account the demographics of the state as a whole, the Legislature seeks to reopen consideration of the figures whose statues are to represent the State of Mississippi in the National Statuary Hall Collection. SECTION 2. (1)  The National Statuary Hall Selection Commission is created.  The commission shall consist of nine (9) members, to be appointed as follows: (a)  Three (3) members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; (b)  Three (3) members appointed by the Speaker of the House; and (c)  Three (3) members appointed by the Governor, to include: (i)  A representative from the Mississippi Economic Council; (ii)  A representative from the Mississippi Arts Commission; and (iii)  A representative from the Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History. All appointments to the commission shall be made not later than July 15, 2026.  The chair of the commission shall be chosen by majority vote of the members of the commission.  Upon the joint call of the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker, the commission shall meet as soon as practicable after the appointments have been made and shall organize for business.  A majority vote of the members of the commission shall be required for the adoption of any reports and recommendations.  The Mississippi Department of Archives and History shall provide meeting space and clerical support for the operation of the commission. (2)  The commission shall have the following functions and duties: (a)  To hold regular public meetings when and where it sees fit; (b)  To receive written public comments in a manner and under the terms and conditions as it sees fit; (c)  To collect, examine and consider all information that it determines may be helpful in making recommendations for two (2) new historic figures to represent Mississippi in the National Statuary Hall Collection; (d)  To make any inquiries and conduct any business that may assist the commission in developing its recommendations, including consultation with experts, representatives of organizations and associations, and others with relevant knowledge or expertise; (e)  To keep minutes of its meetings and make those minutes available to the public; and (f)  To make written recommendations for the selection of two (2) new historic figures for the National Statuary Hall Collection, who bring honor to all Mississippians and reflect the demographics of the state as a whole, which recommendations shall be presented to the Governor and the Legislature not later than November 30, 2026. (3)  Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their service on the commission, but may receive reimbursement for mileage and actual expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41, to the extent that funds are available for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.